Massachusetts, session 194th, H2872.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Paragraph (f) of subdivision 2 of section 5 of chapter 32 of the general laws, 
as appearing in the 2018 official edition, is hereby amended in line 211 by adding after the word 
“law,” the following: “arises for a member otherwise subject to this paragraph where the member 
has a final separate period of creditable service of thirty-six consecutive months or sixty 
consecutive months, and which period was last immediately preceded by a period of creditable 
service that concluded more than twenty years prior to the start of the final period of creditable 
service,”. 

of 2 8  SECTION 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2021.